Arkansas, session 2025, SB519.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 23-81-203(c), concerning the right of an
insurer to defer the payment of any cash surrender value Standard
Nonforfeiture Law for Life Insurance, is amended to read as follows:
(c) The On and after January 1, 2026, the insurer shall reserve the
right to defer the payment of any cash surrender value for a period of six
(6) months after demand therefor with surrender of the policy according to
the terms of the policy, subject to the following:
(1) The policy death benefit shall remain in force until payment
is made; and
(2) If payment is not made within forty-five (45) days after
demand is made for the surrender of the policy, in addition to the cash
surrender value, the insurer shall pay interest on the cash surrender at the
*ANS414*
04-10-2025 13:52:50 ANS414

As Engrossed: H4/10/25 SB519
rate specified under § 23-81-118 and accruing from the date of surrender
until the cash surrender value is paid in full within the six-month period.

/s/J. Boyd
































04-10-2025 13:52:50 ANS414